Utah statutes.
63A-14-403.   Privacy of ethics complaint -- Dismissal -- Contempt.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) or (3), a person, including the complainant, the respondent, a commission member, or staff to the commission may not disclose the existence of a complaint, a response, or any information concerning an alleged violation that is the subject of a complaint.

(b)  A person that violates this Subsection (1) may be held in contempt of the commission in accordance with Section 63A-14-705.

(2)  The restrictions described in Subsection (1) do not apply to:

(a)  a complaint or response that is publicly released by the commission and referred to the Legislature; or

(b)  the respondent's voluntary disclosure that the commission determined that all allegations in a complaint are without merit, after the commission issues an order dismissing the complaint under Section 63A-14-605.

(3)  Nothing in this section prevents a person from disclosing facts or allegations regarding potential criminal violations to law enforcement authorities.

(4)  If the existence of an ethics complaint is publicly disclosed by a person, other than the respondent or an agent of the respondent, during the period that the commission is reviewing the complaint, the commission shall summarily dismiss the complaint without prejudice.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

